Hawaii statutes.
§246-8 Assessment of property of unknown
owners. The taxable property of persons unknown, or some of whom are
unknown, shall be assessed to "unknown owners", or to named persons
and "unknown owners", as the case may be. The taxable property of
persons not having record title thereto on January 1, preceding the tax
year for which the assessment is made, or some of whom did not have record
title thereto on January 1, preceding the tax year for which the
assessment is made, may be assessed to "unknown owners", or to named
persons and "unknown owners", as the case may be. Such property may
be levied upon for unpaid taxes. [L 1932 2d, c 40, §24; RL 1935, §1926; am L
1939, c 221, §4; RL 1945, §5144; RL 1955, §128-7; am L 1967, c 255, §§4, 30,
46; HRS §246-8; am L 1969, c 170, §4; am L 1975, c 157, §4]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next